Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-127
Relative; consent and revocation forms; notarized; filing.

The forms provided by sections 43-124 and 43-126 shall be notarized and filed with the department which shall keep such forms with all other records of an individual adopted person.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 75.